North Dakota statutes. TITLE 10 Corporations
CHAPTER 10-33 Nonprofit Corporations

10-33-01.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Activity” or “activities” means, in a corporation organized under this chapter, the functional equivalent of “business” in a corporation organized under chapter 10-19.1.

“Address” means:

In the case of a registered office or principal executive office, the mailing address, including a zip code, of the actual office location which may not be only a post-office box; and

In any other case, the mailing address, including a zip code.

“Articles” means:

In the case of a corporation incorporated under or governed by this chapter, articles of incorporation, articles of amendment, a resolution of election to become governed by this chapter, a statement of change of registered office, registered agent, or name of registered agent, articles of merger, articles of consolidation, articles of abandonment, and articles of dissolution.

In the case of a foreign corporation, the term includes all records serving a similar function required to be filed with the secretary of state or other officer of the state of incorporation of the foreign corporation.

“Authenticated electronic communication” means:

That the electronic communication is delivered:

To the principal place of activity of the corporation; or

To an officer or agent of the corporation authorized by the corporation to receive the electronic communication; and

That the electronic communication sets forth information from which the corporation can reasonably conclude that the electronic communication was sent by the purported sender.

“Ballot” means a written ballot or a ballot transmitted by electronic communication.

“Board” means the board of directors of a corporation.

“Board member” means an individual serving on the board.

“Bylaws” means the code adopted for the regulation or management of the internal affairs of a corporation, regardless of how designated.

“Corporation” means a corporation, other than a foreign corporation, that is incorporated under or governed by this chapter.

“Director” means a member of the board.

“Domestic organization” means an organization created under the laws of this state.

“Electronic” means relating to technology having electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic, or similar capabilities.

“Electronic communication” means any form of communication, not directly involving the physical transmission of paper:

That creates a record that may be retained, retrieved, and reviewed by a recipient of the communication; and

That may be directly reproduced in paper form by the recipient through an automated process.

“Electronic record” means a record created, generated, sent, communicated, received, or stored by electronic means.

“Electronic signature” means an electronic sound, symbol, or process attached to or logically associated with a record and signed or adopted by a person with the intent to sign the record.

“Filed with the secretary of state” means except as otherwise permitted by law or rule:

That a record meeting the applicable requirements of this chapter, together with the fees provided in section 10-33-140, was delivered or communicated to the secretary of state by a method or medium of communication acceptable by the secretary of state and was determined by the secretary of state to conform to law; and

That the secretary of state did then:

Record the actual date on which the record was filed, and if different, the effective date of filing; and

Record the record in the office of the secretary of state.

“Foreign corporation” means a corporation that is formed under laws other than the laws of this state for a purpose for which a corporation may be organized under this chapter.

“Foreign organization” means an organization created under laws other than the laws of this state for a purpose for which an organization may be created under the laws of this state.

“Good faith” means honesty in fact in the conduct of an act or transaction.

“Intentionally” means the person referred to has a purpose to do or fail to do the act or cause the result specified, or believes the act or failure to act, if successful, will cause that result. A person intentionally violates a statute:

If the person intentionally does the act or causes the result prohibited by the statute; or

If the person intentionally fails to do the act or cause the result required by the statute, even though the person may not know of the existence or constitutionality of the statute or the scope or meaning of the terms used in the statute.

“Internal Revenue Code” means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended from time to time, and successive federal revenue Acts.

“Legal representative” means a person empowered to act for another person, including an agent, manager, officer, partner, or associate of an organization; a trustee of a trust; a personal representative; a trustee in bankruptcy; or a receiver, guardian, custodian, or conservator.

“Member” means a person with membership rights in a corporation under its articles or bylaws, regardless of how the person is identified.

“Members with voting rights” means members or a class of members that has voting rights with respect to the purpose or matter involved.

“Nonprofit purpose” or “nonprofit activity” means a purpose or activity not involving pecuniary gain to any officer, director, or member, other than a member that is a nonprofit organization or subdivision, unit, or agency of the United States or a state or local government.

“Notice”:

Is given by a member of a corporation to the corporation or an officer of the corporation:

When in writing and mailed or delivered to the corporation or the officer at the registered office or principal executive office of the corporation; or

When given by a form of electronic communication consented to by the corporation to which the notice is given if by:

Facsimile communication, when directed to a telephone number at which the corporation has consented to receive notice.

Electronic mail, when directed to an electronic mail address at which the corporation has consented to receive notice.

Posting on an electronic network on which the corporation has consented to receive notice, together with separate notice to the corporation of the specific posting, upon the later of:

The posting; or

The giving of the separate notice.

Any other form of electronic communication by which the corporation has consented to receive notice, when directed to the corporation.

Is given, in all other cases:

When mailed to the person at an address designated by the person or at the last-known address of the person;

When deposited with a nationally recognized overnight delivery service for overnight delivery or, if overnight delivery to the person is not available, for delivery as promptly as practicable, to the person at an address designated by the person or at the last-known address of the person;

When handed to the person;

When left at the office of the person with a clerk or other person in charge of the office or:

If there is no one in charge, when left in a conspicuous place in the office; or

If the office is closed or the person to be notified has no office, when left at the dwelling house or usual place of abode of the person with some person of suitable age and discretion then residing there;

When given by a form of electronic communication consented to by the person to whom the notice is given if by:

Facsimile communication, when directed to a telephone number at which the person has consented to receive notice;

Electronic mail, when directed to an electronic mail address at which the person has consented to receive notice; or

Posting on an electronic network on which the person has consented to receive notice, together with separate notice to the person of the specific posting, upon the later of:

The posting; or

The giving of the separate notice; or

When the method is fair and reasonable when all of the circumstances are considered.

Is given by mail when deposited in the United States mail with sufficient postage affixed.

Is given by deposit for delivery when deposited for delivery as provided in paragraph 2 of subdivision b, after having made sufficient arrangements for payment by the sender.

Is deemed received when it is given.

“Officer” means an individual who is eighteen years of age or more and who is:

Elected, appointed, or otherwise designated as the president, the treasurer, and the secretary, however designated, or any other officer pursuant to section 10-33-49; or

Deemed elected as an officer pursuant to section 10-33-52.

“Organization”:

Means, whether domestic or foreign, a corporation, limited liability company, partnership, limited partnership, limited liability partnership, limited liability limited partnership, business trust, or any other person having a governing statute; but

Excludes:

Any nonprofit corporation, whether a domestic nonprofit corporation which is incorporated under this chapter or a foreign nonprofit corporation which is incorporated in another jurisdiction; or

Any nonprofit limited liability company, whether a domestic nonprofit limited liability company which is organized under chapter 10-36 or a foreign nonprofit limited liability company which is organized in another jurisdiction.

“Principal executive office” means:

If the corporation has an elected or appointed president, then an office where the elected or appointed president of the corporation has an office; or

If the corporation has no elected or appointed president, then the registered office of the corporation.

“Record” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

“Registered office” means the place in this state designated in a corporation’s articles of incorporation or in a foreign corporation’s certificate of authority as the registered office.

“Related organization” means an organization that controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with another organization with control existing if an organization:

Owns, directly or indirectly, at least fifty percent of the ownership interests of another organization;

Has the right, directly or indirectly, to elect, appoint, or remove fifty percent or more of the voting members of the governing body of another organization; or

Has the power, directly or indirectly, to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of another organization, whether through the ownership of voting interests, by contract, or otherwise.

“Remote communication” means communication via electronic communication, conference telephone, videoconference, the internet, or such other means by which persons not physically present in the same location may communicate with each other on a substantially simultaneous basis.

“Signed” means:

That the signature of a person, which may be a facsimile affixed, engraved, printed, placed, stamped with indelible ink, transmitted by facsimile telecommunication or electronically, or in any other manner reproduced on the record with the present intention to authenticate that record; and

With respect to a record required by this chapter to be filed with the secretary of state, that:

The record is signed by a person authorized to do so by this chapter, the articles, or bylaws, a resolution approved by the directors as required by section 10-33-42, or the members with voting rights, if any, as required by section 10-33-72; and

The signature and the record are communicated by a method or medium of communication acceptable by the secretary of state.

“Subsidiary” of a specified organization means an organization having more than fifty percent of the voting power of its ownership interests entitled to vote for directors, governors, or other members of the governing body of the organization owned directly, or indirectly, through related organizations, by the specified organization.

“Surviving corporation” means the corporation or foreign corporation resulting from a merger which:

May pre-exist the merger; or

May be created by the merger.

“Vote” includes authorization by written action.

“Written action” means:

A written record signed by all of the persons required to take the action; or

The counterparts of a written record signed by any of the persons taking the action.

Each counterpart constitutes the action of the persons signing it; and

All the counterparts are one written action by all of the persons signing them.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 1999, ch. 95, § 132; 2003, ch. 85, § 90; 2005, ch. 100, § 92; 2007, ch. 101, § 59; 2007, ch. 354, § 5; 2009, ch. 106, §
47; 2011, ch. 87, § 40; 2021, ch. 85, § 13, effective August 1, 2021.

Law Reviews.

Note: Filling the Gap: Addressing the Potential Impact of North Dakota Adopting Legislation Creating a New Entity — The Low Profit Limited Liability Company, 86 N.D. L. Rev. 535 (2010).

10-33-01.1.
Legal recognition of electronic records and electronic signatures.

For purposes of this chapter:

A record or signature may not be denied legal effect or enforceability solely because it is in electronic form;

A contract may not be denied legal effect or enforceability solely because an electronic record was used in its formation;

If a provision requires a record to be in writing, an electronic record satisfies the requirement; and

If a provision requires a signature, an electronic signature satisfies the requirement.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 85, § 91.

10-33-01.2.
Knowledge and notice.

A person knows or has knowledge of a fact if the person has actual knowledge of it. A person does not know or have knowledge of a fact merely because the person has reason to know or have knowledge of the fact.

A person has notice of a fact if the person:

Knows of the fact;

Has received notice of the fact as provided in subsection 26 of section 10-33-01;

Has reason to know the fact exists from all of the facts known to the person at the time in question; or

Has notice of it under subsection 3.

Subject to subsection 8, a person has notice of:

The intention of a corporation to dissolve, ninety days after the effective date of the filed notice of intent to dissolve stating that the corporation intends to dissolve;

The dissolution of a corporation, ninety days after the effective date of the filed articles of dissolution; and

A merger under sections 10-33-86 through 10-33-92, ninety days after the effective date of the filed articles of merger.

A person notifies or gives a notification to another person by taking the steps provided in subsection 26 of section 10-33-01, whether or not the other person learns of it.

A person receives a notification as provided in subsection 26 of section 10-33-01.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection 7 and except as otherwise provided in subsection 26 of section 10-33-01, a person other than an individual knows, has notice, or receives a notification of a fact for purposes of a particular transaction when the individual conducting the transaction for the person knows, has notice, or receives a notification of the fact, or in any event when the fact would have been brought to the attention of the individual if the person had exercised reasonable diligence.

A person other than an individual exercises reasonable diligence if it maintains reasonable routines for communicating significant information to the individual conducting the transaction for the person and there is reasonable compliance with the routines.

Reasonable diligence does not require an individual acting for the person to communicate information unless the communication is part of the regular duties of the individual or the individual has reason to know of the transaction and that the transaction would be materially affected by the information.

Knowledge, notice, or receipt of a notification of a fact relating to the corporation by an officer or director is effective immediately as knowledge of, notice to, or receipt of a notification by the corporation, except in the case of a fraud on the corporation committed by or with the consent of the officer or director. Knowledge, notice, or receipt of a notification of a fact relating to the corporation by a member who is not an officer or director is not effective as knowledge by, notice to, or receipt of a notification by the corporation.

Notice otherwise effective under subsection 3 does not affect the power of a person to transfer real property held in the name of a corporation unless at the time of transfer a certified copy of the relevant statement, amendment, or articles, as filed with the secretary of state, has been recorded in the office of the county recorder in the county in which the real property affected by the statement, amendment, or articles is located.

With respect to notice given by a form of electronic communication:

Consent by an officer or director to notice given by electronic communication may be given in writing or by authenticated electronic communication. The corporation is entitled to rely on any consent so given until revoked by the officer or director. However, no revocation affects the validity of any notice given before receipt by the corporation of revocation of the consent.

An affidavit of an officer or director or an authorized agent of the corporation that the notice has been given by a form of electronic communication is, in the absence of fraud, prima facie evidence of the facts stated in the affidavit.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 100, § 93.

10-33-01.3.
Reservation of legislative right.

The legislative assembly reserves the right to amend or repeal the provisions of this chapter. A corporation incorporated under or governed by this chapter is subject to this reserved right.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 101, § 60.

10-33-02.
Application and election.

This chapter applies to all nonprofit corporations incorporated for a purpose for which a corporation might be incorporated under this chapter.

A corporation in existence before August 1, 1997, which has incorporated under chapters 10-24, 10-25, 10-26, 10-27, and 10-28 as they existed on July 31, 1997, or any other chapter that provides that corporations incorporated under that chapter and governed by the nonprofit corporation laws of this state, may elect after July 31, 1997, and before August 1, 1998, to become governed by this chapter.

If the articles of an electing corporation include a provision prohibited by this chapter or omit a provision required by this chapter or are otherwise inconsistent with this chapter, the electing corporation shall amend its articles to conform to the requirements of this chapter. The appropriate provisions of the corporation’s articles or bylaws or the law by which it was governed before the effective date of the election made pursuant to this section control the manner of adoption of the amendment.

An election by a corporation to become governed by this chapter must be made by resolution approved by the affirmative vote of the members with voting rights of the same proportion that is required for amendment of the articles of the corporation before the election.

If there are no members with voting rights, the corporation must elect to be governed by this chapter by a resolution adopted by a majority vote of the directors entitled to vote at a meeting of the board, with proper notice given. The notice must include a statement that a purpose of the meeting is to consider an election to become governed by this chapter.

The original of the resolution, and articles of amendment if required, must be filed with the secretary of state.

The resolution and articles of amendment become effective upon acceptance by the secretary of state.

If no amendment of the articles is required, the resolution must state that the articles of the corporation conform to the requirements of this chapter.

Upon filing an election pursuant to this section, all provisions of the bylaws that are consistent with this chapter remain or become effective and all provisions of the bylaws that are inconsistent with this chapter cease to be effective.

After July 31, 1998, this chapter applies to all existing corporations incorporated under any chapter of this code providing for the incorporation of corporations for a purpose or purposes for which a corporation might be incorporated under this chapter or which are otherwise to be governed by the nonprofit corporation laws of this state.

All provisions of the articles and bylaws of the corporation which may be included in the articles or bylaws under this chapter remain in effect, and all provisions of the articles and bylaws of the corporation which are inconsistent with this chapter cease to be effective on August 1, 1998.

Any provisions required by this chapter to be contained in the articles that do not appear in the articles are read into them as a matter of law.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

10-33-03.
Transition.

The continuation or completion of any act by a corporation that has not incorporated under, but has become governed by, this chapter, and the continuation or performance of any executed or wholly or partially executory contract, conveyance, or transfer to or by the corporation, if otherwise lawful before the corporation became governed by this chapter, remains valid, and may be continued, completed, consummated, enforced, or terminated as required or permitted by a statute applicable prior to the date on which the corporation became governed by this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

10-33-04.
Purposes.

Unless otherwise limited in its articles, a corporation has a general purpose of engaging in any lawful nonprofit activity.

A corporation may be incorporated under this chapter for any lawful nonprofit purpose, unless another statute requires incorporation under a different law. A corporation of this type engaging in conduct that is regulated by another statute is subject to the limitations of the other statute, except it may not:

Be formed for a purpose involving pecuniary gain to its members, other than to members that are nonprofit organizations, subdivisions, units, or agencies of the United States, a state, or a local government; or

Pay dividends or other pecuniary remuneration, directly or indirectly, to its members, excluding members that are nonprofit organizations or subdivisions, units, or agencies of the United States, a state, or a local government.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

Collateral References.

Nonprofit purposes and character which warrant creation of nonprofit corporation, 16 A.L.R.2d 1345.

Name: right of charitable or religious association or corporation to protection against use of same or similar name by another, 37 A.L.R.3d 277.

10-33-05.
Incorporators.

One or more individuals age eighteen or more may act as incorporators of a corporation by filing with the secretary of state articles of incorporation for the corporation.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

10-33-06.
Articles.

The articles of incorporation must contain:

The name of the corporation;

The name of the registered agent of the corporation as provided in chapter 10-01.1 and, if a noncommercial registered agent, then the address of that noncommercial registered agent in this state;

The address of the principal executive office;

The name and address of each incorporator;

The effective date of the incorporation:

If a later date than that on which the certificate of incorporation is issued by the secretary of state; and

Which may not be later than ninety days after the date on which the certificate of incorporation is issued; and

A statement that the corporation is incorporated under this chapter.

The following articles govern a corporation unless modified by the articles:

A corporation has a general purpose of engaging in any lawful nonprofit activity as provided in section 10-33-04;

A corporation has perpetual existence and certain powers as provided in section 10-33-21;

The power to initially adopt, amend, or repeal the bylaws is vested in the board as provided in section 10-33-26;

Cumulative voting is prohibited as provided in section 10-33-34;

The affirmative vote of a majority of the directors present is required for an action of the board as provided in section 10-33-42;

A written action by the board taken without a meeting must be signed by all directors as provided in section 10-33-43;

Members are of one class as provided in section 10-33-57; and

A written action by the members must be signed by all members as provided in section 10-33-73.

The following provisions govern a corporation unless modified either in the articles or bylaws:

A certain method must be used for amending the articles as provided in section 10-33-15;

Certain procedures apply to the adoption, amendment, or repeal of bylaws by the members as provided in section 10-33-26;

A director holds office for an indefinite term that expires upon the election of a successor as provided in section 10-33-30;

The term of a director filling a vacancy expires at the end of the term the director is filling as provided in section 10-33-30;

The compensation of directors is fixed by the board as provided in section 10-33-32;

The method provided in section 10-33-36 or 10-33-37 must be used for removal of directors;

The method provided in section 10-33-38 must be used for filling board vacancies;

Board meetings must be held at least once per year and if the board fails to select a place for a board meeting, it must be held at the principal executive office as provided in subsection 1 of section 10-33-39;

A director may call a board meeting, and the notice of the meeting need not state the purpose of the meeting as provided in subsection 3 of section 10-33-39;

A majority of the board is a quorum as provided in section 10-33-41;

The affirmative vote of the majority of directors present is required for board action as provided in section 10-33-42;

A committee:

Must consist of one or more persons, who need not be directors, appointed by the board as provided in section 10-33-44; and

May create one or more subcommittees, each consisting of one or more members of the committee and may delegate to the subcommittee any or all of the authority of the committee as provided in subsection 7 of section 10-33-44;

Unless the articles or bylaws or a resolution adopted by the board, and not inconsistent with the articles or bylaws, provides otherwise, the officers shall have the duties provided in section 10-33-50;

The method provided in section 10-33-54 must be used for removal of officers;

If not prohibited by the board from doing so, officers may delegate some or all of their duties and powers as provided in section 10-33-55;

A corporation does not have members as provided in section 10-33-57;

The board may determine the consideration required to admit members as provided in section 10-33-57;

All members are entitled to vote and have equal rights and preferences in matters as provided in section 10-33-57;

Memberships are nontransferable except as provided in section 10-33-59;

A corporation with voting members must hold a regular meeting of voting members annually as provided in section 10-33-65;

If a specific minimum notice period has not been fixed by law, then at least five days’ notice is required for a meeting of members as provided in section 10-33-68;

The board may fix a date up to fifty days before the date of a members’ meeting as the date for determination of the members entitled to notice of and entitled to vote at the meeting as provided in section 10-33-68;

Each member with voting rights has one vote as provided in section 10-33-71;

The affirmative vote of the majority of members with voting rights present and entitled to vote is required for action of the members, unless this chapter or the articles or bylaws require a greater vote or voting by class as provided in section 10-33-72;

Members with voting rights may take action at a meeting by voice or ballot, by unanimous action without a meeting, by mailed ballot, or by electronic communication as provided in section 10-33-72;

The number of members required for a quorum is ten percent of the members entitled to vote as provided in section 10-33-76;

The procedures provided in section 10-33-78 govern acceptance of member acts; and

Indemnification of certain persons is required as provided in section 10-33-84.

The following provisions relating to the management or regulation of the affairs of a corporation may be included in the articles or, except for naming members of the first board, in the bylaws:

The first board of directors may be named in the articles as provided in section 10-33-25;

Additional qualifications for directors may be imposed as provided in section 10-33-29;

Terms of directors may be staggered as provided in section 10-33-30;

The date, time, and place of board meetings may be fixed as provided in section 10-33-39;

Additional officers may be designated as provided in section 10-33-49;

Additional powers, rights, duties, and responsibilities may be given to officers as provided in section 10-33-50;

A method for filling vacant offices may be specified as provided in section 10-33-54;

Membership criteria and procedures for admission may be established as provided in section 10-33-57;

Membership terms may be fixed as provided in section 10-33-57;

A corporation may issue membership certificates or preferred or common shares as the board deems appropriate as provided in section 10-33-58;

A corporation may levy dues, assessments, or fees on members as provided in section 10-33-60;

A corporation may buy memberships as provided in section 10-33-63;

A corporation may have delegates with some or all the authority of members as provided in section 10-33-64;

The date, time, and place of regular member meetings or the place of special meetings may be fixed as provided in section 10-33-65;

Certain persons may be authorized to call special meetings of members as provided in section 10-33-66;

Notices of special member meetings may be required to contain certain information as provided in section 10-33-68;

A larger than majority vote may be required for member action as provided in section 10-33-72;

Members with voting rights may vote by proxy as provided in section 10-33-77; and

Members with voting rights may enter into voting agreements as provided in section 10-33-79.

The articles may contain other provisions consistent with law relating to the management or regulation of the affairs of the corporation.

It is not necessary to state the corporate powers granted by this chapter in the articles.

If there is a conflict between subsection 2, 3, or 4 and another section of this chapter, then the other section controls.

Subsection 4 does not limit the right of the board, by resolution, to take an action that the bylaws may authorize under this subsection without including the authorization in the bylaws, unless the authorization is required to be in the bylaws by another provision of this chapter.

Except for provisions included pursuant to subsection 1, any provision of the articles may:

Be made dependent upon facts ascertainable outside the articles, but only if the manner in which the facts operate upon the provision is clearly and expressly set forth in the articles; and

Incorporate by reference some or all of the terms of any agreements, contracts, or other arrangements entered into by the corporation, but only if the corporation retains at its principal executive office a copy of the agreements, contracts, or other arrangements or the portions incorporated by reference.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 1999, ch. 50, § 30; 1999, ch. 95, § 133; 2005, ch. 100, § 94; 2007, ch. 99, § 42; 2007, ch. 101, § 61; 2011, ch. 87, § 41; 2013, ch. 89, § 11.

10-33-07.
Private foundations — Provisions considered contained in articles.

The articles of incorporation of a corporation that is a private foundation as defined in section 509(a) of the Internal Revenue Code and an instrument governing the use, retention, or disposition by the corporation of its income or property must contain the provisions contained in this section. If the articles and instrument do not contain these provisions, they are considered to have incorporated the language in subdivisions a through e with the same effect as though the language was set forth verbatim. Except as provided in subsection 2, these provisions govern the corporation as to the use, retention, and disposition of its income and property regardless of provisions of the articles or instrument or other law of this state to the contrary:

The corporation shall distribute for each of its taxable years amounts at least sufficient to avoid liability for the tax imposed by section 4942(a) of the Internal Revenue Code;

The corporation may not engage in an act of “self-dealing” as defined in section 4941(d) of the Internal Revenue Code that would give rise to liability for the tax imposed by section 4941(a) of the Internal Revenue Code;

The corporation may not retain “excess business holdings” as defined in section 4943(c) of the Internal Revenue Code that would give rise to liability for the tax imposed by section 4943(a) of the Internal Revenue Code;

The corporation may not make investments that would jeopardize the carrying out of the exempt purposes of the corporation, within the meaning of section 4944 of the Internal Revenue Code, so as to give rise to liability for the tax imposed by section 4944(a) of the Internal Revenue Code; and

The corporation may not make a “taxable expenditure” as defined in section 4945(d) of the Internal Revenue Code that would give rise to liability for the tax imposed by section 4945(a) of the Internal Revenue Code.

Subsection 1 does not apply to a corporation if a court of competent jurisdiction determines that the application would be contrary to the terms of an instrument described in subsection 1 and that the instrument may not properly be changed to conform to subsection 1.

A reference in subsection 1 to a particular section of the Internal Revenue Code includes the corresponding provision of a future United States internal revenue law.

This section applies to all corporations that could be governed by this chapter, notwithstanding section 10-33-02.

This section does not impair the rights and powers of the attorney general or the courts of this state with respect to a corporation.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

10-33-08.
Filing of articles of incorporation.

An original of the articles of incorporation must be filed with the secretary of state. If the secretary of state finds that the articles of incorporation conform and all fees have been paid under section 10-33-140, the secretary of state shall issue a certificate of incorporation to the incorporators or their representative.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

10-33-09.
Effective date of incorporation.

The corporate existence begins upon the issuance of the certificate of incorporation or at a later date as specified in the articles of incorporation. The certificate of incorporation is conclusive evidence that all conditions precedent and required to be performed by the incorporators have been performed and that the corporation has been incorporated under this chapter, except as against this state in a proceeding to cancel or revoke the certificate of incorporation or for involuntary dissolution of the corporation.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.